Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1081.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 8, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 8-469.03, to read: START_STATUTE8-469.03. Department cases; attorney appearances Notwithstanding any other law, in a department case involving dependency, adoption, termination of parental rights or guardianship, an individual attorney who represents the department may not appear before a judge if the individual attorney has appeared before that same judge within the department's previous five cases. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative intent and findings A. The legislature intends to promote the interests of biological families and avoid removal and placement of minors in foster care when possible, even to the extent of kinship promotion.  Removal of a minor must be the last viable option. B. The legislature finds that the potential for bias is inherently countered and undue influence through familiarity is minimized by ensuring the rotation of attorneys who appear in front of various judges and courtrooms.